Vermont, session 2025-2026, H931.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Approved Independent School Moratorium * * *
Sec. 1. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.511.1, as amended by 2025
Acts and Resolves No. 72, Sec. 16, is amended to read:
Sec. E.511.1 MORATORIUM ON APPROVAL OF NEW APPROVED
INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Board
of Education shall be prohibited from approving an application for initial
approval of an approved independent school until further direction by the
General Assembly.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a change in either tax
status or conversion to a nonprofit organization by a therapeutic approved
independent school, absent any other changes, shall not affect the approval
status of the school.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the moratorium
on approval of new approved independent schools shall not apply to changes in
ownership of therapeutic approved independent schools as that term is defined
in 16 V.S.A. § 828(d). If submission of an application for initial approval of
an approved independent school is required as the result of a change in
ownership of a therapeutic approved independent school that at the time of the
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 2 of 27
2026
change in ownership is approved by the State Board of Education pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 166, and the school will remain a therapeutic approved
independent school after the change in ownership is complete, the moratorium
created pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not apply and the
Agency of Education and State Board of Education shall process the
application according to applicable State and federal law.
* * * Interstate Compact for Education * * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. chapter 35 is added to read:
CHAPTER 35. INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR EDUCATION
§ 1501. PURPOSE AND POLICY—ARTICLE I
(a) It is the purpose of this compact to:
(1) establish and maintain close cooperation and understanding among
executive, legislative, professional educational, and lay leadership on a
nationwide basis at the state and local levels;
(2) provide a forum for the discussion, development, crystallization, and
recommendation of public policy alternatives in the field of education;
(3) provide a clearinghouse of information on matters relating to
education problems and how they are being met in different places throughout
the nation, so that the executive and legislative branches of state government
and of local communities may have ready access to the experience and record
of the entire country, and so that both lay and professional groups in the field
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 3 of 27
2026
of education may have additional avenues for the sharing of experience and the
interchange of ideas in the formation of public policy in education;
(4) facilitate the improvement of state and local education systems so
that all of them will be able to meet adequate and desirable goals in a society
that requires continuous qualitative and quantitative advance in educational
opportunities, methods, and facilities.
(b) It is the policy of this compact to encourage and promote local and state
initiative in the development, maintenance, improvement, and administration
of education systems and institutions in a manner that will accord with the
needs and advantages of diversity among localities and states.
(c) The party states recognize that each of them has an interest in the
quality and quantity of education furnished in each of the other states, as well
as in the excellence of its own education systems and institutions, because of
the highly mobile character of individuals within the nation, and because the
products and services contributing to the health, welfare, and economic
advancement of each state are supplied in significant part by persons educated
in other states.
§ 1502. STATE DEFINED—ARTICLE II
As used in this compact, “state” means a state, territory, or possession of the
United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 4 of 27
2026
§ 1503. THE COMMISSION—ARTICLE III
(a) The Education Commission of the States, hereinafter called “the
Commission,” is hereby established. The Commission shall consist of seven
members representing each party state. One of such members shall be the
governor; two shall be members of the state legislature selected by its
respective houses and serving in such manner as the legislature may determine;
and four shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless
the laws of the state otherwise provide. If the laws of a state prevent
legislators from serving on the Commission, six members shall be appointed
and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless the laws of the state otherwise
provide. In addition to any other principles or requirements which a state may
establish for the appointment and service of its members of the Commission,
the guiding principle for the composition of the membership on the
Commission from each party state shall be that the members representing such
state shall, by virtue of their training, experience, knowledge, or affiliations, be
in a position collectively to reflect broadly the interests of the state
government, higher education, the state education system, local education, and
lay and professional, public and nonpublic educational leadership. Of those
appointees, one shall be the head of a state agency or institution, designated by
the governor, having responsibility for one or more programs of public
education. In addition to the members of the Commission representing the
party states, there may be not to exceed 10 nonvoting commissioners selected
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 5 of 27
2026
by the Steering Committee for terms of one year. Such commissioners shall
represent leading national organizations of professional educators or persons
concerned with educational administration.
(b) The members of the Commission shall be entitled to one vote each on
the Commission. No action of the Commission shall be binding unless taken
at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the
Commission are cast in favor thereof. Action of the Commission shall be only
at a meeting at which a majority of the commissioners are present. The
Commission shall meet at least once a year. In its bylaws, and subject to such
directions and limitations as may be contained therein, the Commission may
delegate the exercise of any of its powers to the Steering Committee or the
Executive Director, except for the power to approve budgets or requests for
appropriations, the power to make policy recommendations pursuant to section
1504 of this chapter, and adoption of the annual report pursuant to subsection
(j) of this section.
(c) The Commission shall have a seal.
(d) The Commission shall elect annually, from among its members, a
chairman, who shall be a governor; a vice chairman; and a treasurer. The
Commission shall provide for the appointment of an Executive Director. Such
Executive Director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission, and together
with the Treasurer and such other personnel as the Commission may deem
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 6 of 27
2026
appropriate shall be bonded in such amount as the Commission shall
determine. The Executive Director shall be Secretary.
(e) Irrespective of the civil service, personnel, or other merit system laws of
any of the party states, the Executive Director, subject to the approval of the
Steering Committee, shall appoint, remove, or discharge such personnel as
may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the Commission and
shall fix the duties and compensation of such personnel. The Commission in
its bylaws shall provide for the personnel policies and programs of the
Commission.
(f) The Commission may borrow, accept, or contract for the services of
personnel from any party jurisdiction, the United States or any subdivision or
agency of the aforementioned governments, or from any agency of two or
more of the party jurisdictions or their subdivisions.
(g) The Commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions
under this compact any and all donations and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the
United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm,
association, foundation or corporation, and may receive, utilize, and dispose of
the same. Any donation or grant accepted by the Commission pursuant to this
subsection or services borrowed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section shall
be reported in the annual report of the Commission. Such report shall include
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 7 of 27
2026
the nature, amount, and conditions, if any, of the donation, grant, or services
borrowed, and the identity of the donor or lender.
(h) The Commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be
necessary for the transacting of its business. The Commission may acquire,
hold, and convey real and personal property and any interest therein.
(i) The Commission shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business and
shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws. The Commission
shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a
copy of any amendment thereto with the appropriate agency or officer in each
of the party states.
(j) The Commission annually shall make to the governor and legislature of
each party state a report covering the activities of the Commission for the
preceding year. The Commission may make such additional reports as it may
deem desirable.
§ 1504. POWERS—ARTICLE IV
In addition to authority conferred on the Commission by other provisions of
the Compact, the Commission shall have authority to:
(1) collect, correlate, analyze, and interpret information and data
concerning educational needs and resources;
(2) encourage and foster research in all aspects of education, but with
special reference to the desirable scope of instruction, organization,
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 8 of 27
2026
administration, and instructional methods and standards employed or suitable
for employment in public education systems;
(3) develop proposals for adequate financing of education as a whole
and at each of its many levels;
(4) conduct or participate in research of the types referred to in this
section in any instance where the Commission finds that such research is
necessary for the advancement of the purposes and policies of this compact,
using fully the resources of national associations, regional compact
organizations for higher education, and other agencies and institutions, both
public and private;
(5) formulate suggested policies and plans for the improvement of
public education as a whole, or for any segment thereof, and make
recommendations with respect thereto available to the appropriate
governmental units, agencies, and public officials;
(6) do such other things as may be necessary or incidental to the
administration of any of its authority or functions pursuant to this compact.
§ 1505. COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL GOVERNMENT—ARTICLE V
(a) If the laws of the United States specifically so provide, or if
administrative provision is made therefore within the federal government, the
United States may be represented on the Commission by not to exceed 10
representatives. Any such representative or representatives of the United
States shall be appointed and serve in such manner as may be provided by or
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 9 of 27
2026
pursuant to federal law, and may be drawn from any one or more branches of
the federal government, but no such representative shall have a vote on the
Commission.
(b) The Commission may provide information and make recommendations
to any executive or legislative agency or officer of the federal government
concerning the common education policies of the states, and may advise with
any such agencies or officers concerning any matter of mutual interest.
§ 1506. COMMITTEES—ARTICLE VI
(a) To assist in the expeditious conduct of its business when the full
Commission is not meeting, the Commission shall elect a Steering Committee
of 32 members which, subject to the provisions of this compact and consistent
with the policies of the Commission, shall be constituted and function as
provided in the bylaws of the Commission. One-fourth of the voting
membership of the Steering Committee shall consist of governors, one-fourth
shall consist of legislators, and the remainder shall consist of other members of
the Commission. A federal representative on the Commission may serve with
the Steering Committee, but without vote. The voting members of the Steering
Committee shall serve for terms of two years, except that members elected to
the first Steering Committee of the Commission shall be elected as follows: 16
for one year and 16 for two years. The Chairman, Vice Chairman, and
Treasurer of the Commission shall be members of the Steering Committee and,
anything in this subsection to the contrary notwithstanding, shall serve during
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 10 of 27
2026
their continuance in these offices. Vacancies in the Steering Committee shall
not affect its authority to act, but the Commission at its next regularly ensuing
meeting following the occurrence of any vacancy shall fill it for the unexpired
term. No person shall serve more than two terms as a member of the Steering
Committee, provided that service for a partial term of one year or less shall not
be counted toward the two-term limitation.
(b) The Commission may establish advisory and technical committees
composed of state, local and federal officials, and private persons to advise it
with respect to any one or more of its functions. Any advisory or technical
committee may, on request of the states concerned, be established to consider
any matter of special concern to two or more of the party states.
(c) The Commission may establish such additional committees as its
bylaws may provide.
§ 1507. FINANCE—ARTICLE VII
(a) The Commission shall advise the governor or designated officer or
officers of each party state of its budget and estimated expenditures for such
period as may be required by the laws of that party state. Each of the
Commission’s budgets of estimated expenditures shall contain specific
recommendations of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by each of the
party states.
(b) The total amount of appropriation requests under any budget shall be
apportioned among the party states. In making such apportionment, the
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 11 of 27
2026
Commission shall devise and employ a formula which takes equitable account
of the populations and per capita income levels of the party states.
(c) The Commission shall not pledge the credit of any party states. The
Commission may meet any of its obligations in whole or in part with funds
available to it pursuant to subsection 1503(g) of this chapter of this compact,
provided that the Commission takes specific action setting aside such funds
prior to incurring an obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner.
Except where the Commission makes funds available to it pursuant to
subsection 1503(g) of this chapter thereof, the Commission shall not incur any
obligation prior to the allotment of funds by the party states adequate to meet
the same.
(d) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the audit and accounting procedures established by its bylaws.
However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be audited yearly by a qualified public accountant, and the report of the
audit shall be included in and become part of the annual reports of the
Commission.
(e) The accounts of the Commission shall be open at any reasonable time
for inspection by duly constituted officers of the party states and by any
persons authorized by the Commission.
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 12 of 27
2026
(f) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent Commission
compliance with laws relating to audit or inspection of accounts by or on
behalf of any government contributing to the support of the Commission.
§ 1508. ELIGIBLE PARTIES; ENTRY INTO AND WITHDRAWAL—
ARTICLE VIII
(a) This compact shall have as eligible parties all states, territories, and
possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. In respect of any such jurisdiction not having
a governor, the term “governor,” as used in this compact, shall mean the
closest equivalent official of such jurisdiction.
(b) Any state or other eligible jurisdiction may enter into this compact, and
it shall become binding thereon when it has adopted the same, provided that in
order to enter into initial effect, adoption by at least 10 eligible party
jurisdictions shall be required.
(c) Adoption of the Compact may be either by enactment thereof or by
adherence thereto by the governor; provided that in the absence of enactment,
adherence by the governor shall be sufficient to make his state a party only
until December 31, 1967. During any period when a state is participating in
this compact through gubernatorial action, the governor shall appoint
those persons who, in addition to himself, shall serve as the members of the
Commission from his state, and shall provide to the Commission an equitable
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 13 of 27
2026
share of the financial support of the Commission from any source available to
him.
(d) Except for a withdrawal effective on December 31, 1967, in accordance
with subsection (c) of this section, any party state may withdraw from this
compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall
take effect until one year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given
notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states.
No withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or chargeable to a
party state prior to the time of such withdrawal.
§ 1509. AMENDMENTS TO THE COMPACT—ARTICLE IX
This compact may be amended by a vote of two-thirds of the members of
the Commission present and voting when ratified by the legislatures of two-
thirds of the party states.
§ 1510. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY—ARTICLE X
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the
constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application thereof to
any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity
of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If
this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 14 of 27
2026
therein, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the state
affected as to all severable matters.
* * * Background Checks * * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 254a is added to read:
§ 254a. AGENCY OF EDUCATION EMPLOYEES
(a) The Agency of Education shall request criminal record information for
a person the Secretary of Education is prepared to recommend for any full-
time, part-time, or temporary employment or contractual relationship with the
Agency if such person will have or has the potential to have unsupervised
contact with students (the applicant).
(b) After signing a user agreement, the Secretary shall make a request for
criminal records directly to the Vermont Crime Information Center.
(c) A request made under subsection (b) of this section shall be
accompanied by a release signed by the applicant on a form provided by the
Vermont Crime Information Center and a set of the applicant’s fingerprints.
The Agency shall pay the fingerprinting fee required pursuant to 20 V.S.A.
§ 2062 and shall pay any fee required by the FBI associated with a fingerprint-
supported criminal record check. The release form to be signed by the
applicant shall include a statement informing the applicant of:
(1) the right to challenge the accuracy of the record by appealing to the
Vermont Crime Information Center pursuant to rules adopted by the
Commissioner of Public Safety; and
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 15 of 27
2026
(2) the Secretary of Education’s policy regarding maintenance and
destruction of records and the applicant’s right to request that the record or
notice be maintained for purposes of using it to comply with future criminal
record check requests made pursuant to section 256 of this title.
(d) Upon completion of a criminal record check, the Vermont Crime
Information Center shall send to the Secretary a notice that no record exists or,
if a record exists, a copy of any criminal record. If a copy of a criminal record
is received, the Secretary shall forward it to the applicant and shall inform the
applicant in writing of:
(1) the right to challenge the accuracy of the record by appealing to the
Vermont Crime Information Center pursuant to rules adopted by the
Commissioner of Public Safety; and
(2) the Secretary of Education’s policy regarding maintenance and
destruction of records and the applicant’s right to request that the record or
notice be maintained for purposes of using it to comply with future criminal
record check requests made pursuant to section 256 of this title.
(e) The Secretary shall request and obtain information from the Child
Protection Registry maintained by the Department for Children and Families
and from the Vulnerable Adult Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation Registry
maintained by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living
(collectively, the Registries) for any applicant for whom a criminal record
check is required under subsection (a) of this section. The Departments for
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 16 of 27
2026
Children and Families and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall
adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 governing the process for
obtaining information from the Registries and for disseminating and
maintaining records of that information under this subsection.
(f) An applicant convicted of a sex offense that requires registration
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3 shall not be eligible for
employment with the Agency.
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 256 is amended to read:
§ 256. CONTINUED VALIDITY OF CRIMINAL RECORD CHECK;
MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS
(a)(1) Anyone required to request a criminal record check under this
subchapter about a person who previously has undergone a check, regardless
of whether the check was for student teaching, licensure, or employment
purposes, shall comply with that requirement by acquiring the results of the
previous criminal record check unless:
(A) the person refuses to authorize release of the information;
(B) the record no longer exists;
(C) since the record check, there has been a period of one year or
more during which the person has not worked for a Vermont school district or,
a recognized or an approved independent school, or the Agency of Education;
or
(D) as otherwise required by this chapter.
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 17 of 27
2026
(2) Anyone required to request a criminal record check under this
subchapter about a person who has previously undergone a check may request
a name and date of birth or fingerprint-supported recheck of the criminal
record at any time during the course of the record subject’s employment in the
capacity for which the original check was required. Rechecking criminal
records may be accomplished through a subscription service.
* * *
* * * Intercollegiate Sexual Harm Prevention Council * * *
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 183 is amended to read:
§ 183. INTERCOLLEGIATE SEXUAL HARM PREVENTION COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Intercollegiate Sexual Harm Prevention
Council to create a coordinated advance best practices for prevention of and
response to campus sexual harm across institutions of higher learning in
Vermont.
(b) Membership.
(1) The Council shall be composed of the following members:
(A)(1) a the Title IX coordinator and a campus-based sexual harm
prevention/education coordinator from an institution of higher learning,
appointed by the Chancellor of the Vermont State Colleges or designee from
each postsecondary school chartered in Vermont with a physical campus
located within Vermont;
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 18 of 27
2026
(B)(2) a Title IX coordinator and a campus-based sexual harm
prevention/education coordinator from an institution of higher learning,
appointed by the President of the University of Vermont a peer educator or
advocate appointed by the Vice Provost for Student Affairs of the University
of Vermont;
(C)(3) a Title IX coordinator and a campus-based sexual harm
prevention/education coordinator from an institution of higher learning,
appointed by the President of the Association of Vermont Independent
Colleges the Executive Director of the Network Against Domestic and Sexual
Violence or designee;
(D)(4) two community-based sexual violence advocates, appointed
by the Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence the Program
Coordinator of the Vermont Forensic Nursing Program or designee; and
(E)(5) two law enforcement or public safety representatives with
experience responding to and investigating campus sexual violence, appointed
by the Commissioner of Public Safety; the Commissioner of Public Safety or
designee.
(F) three college students, at least one of whom has lived experience
as a sexual violence survivor and one who represents a campus-based racial
justice organization, appointed by the Center for Crime Victim Services;
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 19 of 27
2026
(G) a person with expertise in sexual violence responses within the
lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer community, appointed by the
Center for Crime Victim Services;
(H) a sexual assault nurse examiner, appointed by the Network
Against Domestic and Sexual Violence;
(I) a prosecutor with experience in prosecuting sexual violence cases
from either the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs or the Office of
the Attorney General, appointed by the Attorney General; and
(J) an attorney with experience in sexual violence cases, appointed by
the Defender General.
(2) To ensure a council that is reflective of Vermont’s college campuses,
appointing authorities shall consider diversity when making appointments to
the Council.
(c) Duties. The Council shall:
(1) review the recommendations from the Report of the Vermont
Campus Sexual Harm Task Force and develop prevention solutions to sexual
harm based on those recommendations; [Repealed.]
(2) implement interdisciplinary planning and information sharing to
support sexual violence prevention programs on every college campus in
Vermont; [Repealed.]
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 20 of 27
2026
(3) undertake an annual review of trends in aggregate data collected by
institutions of higher learning regarding sexual violence on college campuses
in Vermont; [Repealed.]
(4) identify and share information about effective practices on regarding
sexual violence prevention and response, sexual health education, and
strategies for mitigating sexual harm and secondary impacts of sexual harm on
college campuses in Vermont;
(5) identify share information about campus-wide activities,
publications, and services that promote a campus culture of respect to support
the prevention of sexual harm; and
(6) recommend statutory protections to the General Assembly not later
than November 1, 2021 to ensure that survivors of sexual harm are not
punished for reporting an incident of sexual violence due to alcohol, drug use,
or other minor conduct violations occurring at or around the time of an assault;
and [Repealed.]
(7) create or promote annual share information about training
opportunities addressing prevention and sexual assault response processes
open to representatives from all Vermont postsecondary schools for college
populations.
(d) Assistance. The Council shall have the administrative and technical
assistance of the Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 21 of 27
2026
(e) Report. On or before December 1, 2022 and annually thereafter, the
Council shall submit a written report to the General Assembly with a summary
of activities and any recommendations for legislative action. [Repealed.]
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence shall call the
first meeting of the Council to occur on or before July 15, 2021 November 15,
2026.
(2) The Council shall select a chair co-chairs from among its members
at the first meeting, with one chair representing a public postsecondary school
and one chair representing a private postsecondary school.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Council shall meet quarterly twice per year.
(5) Members who are not otherwise compensated by the member’s
employer for attendance at meetings shall be entitled to per diem compensation
and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the Network Against
Domestic and Sexual Violence for such purposes The co-chairs shall provide
the Council with administrative support.
(6) The Council may invite or consult other community representatives
as it deems appropriate.
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 22 of 27
2026
* * * Hazing, Harassment, and Bullying Advisory Council * * *
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 570 is amended to read:
§ 570. HARASSMENT, HAZING, AND BULLYING PREVENTION
POLICIES
* * *
(d) Duties of the Secretary. The Secretary shall:
(1) develop and, from time to time, update model harassment, hazing,
and bullying prevention policies; and
(2) establish an Advisory Council to review and coordinate school and
statewide activities relating to the prevention of and response to harassment,
hazing, and bullying. The Council shall report annually in January to the State
Board and the House and Senate Committees on Education. The Council shall
include:
(A) the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or
designee;
(B) the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards Association
or designee;
(C) the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents
Association or designee;
(D) the President of the Vermont-National Education Association or
designee;
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 23 of 27
2026
(E) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights
Commission or designee;
(F) the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools
Association or designee; and
(G) other members selected by the Secretary, at least one of whom
shall be a current secondary student who has witnessed or experienced
harassment, hazing, or bullying in the school environment; and
(3) provide the Advisory Council with administrative support.
(e) Advisory Council on Harassment, Hazing, and Bullying Prevention in
Schools.
(1) Membership. The Advisory Council shall be composed of the
following members:
(A) the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or
designee;
(B) the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards
Association or designee;
(C) the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents
Association or designee;
(D) the President of the Vermont-National Education Association or
designee;
(E) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights
Commission or designee;
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 24 of 27
2026
(F) the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools
Association or designee;
(G) two members who serve as designated employees under the
hazing, harassment, and bullying prevention policy, appointed by the Secretary
of Education;
(H) a member, appointed by the Vermont Educational Equity
Collective;
(I) a school social worker, appointed by the National Association of
Social Workers-Vermont Chapter;
(J) a member, appointed by the Vermont Coalition for Disability
Rights;
(K) a student member, appointed by the Vermont Student Anti-
Racism Network;
(L) a student member, appointed by Outright Vermont;
(M) a member, appointed by the Office of Racial Equity;
(N) a member, appointed by the Commission on Women;
(O) a member, appointed by the Vermont Network Against Domestic
and Sexual Violence; and
(P) a parent or caregiver member, appointed by the Vermont Family
Network.
(2) Duties. The Advisory Council shall:
(A) meet at least four and not more than 12 times per year;
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 25 of 27
2026
(B) review and advise on coordination of school and statewide
activities relating to the prevention of and response to harassment, hazing, and
bullying;
(C) review the model harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention
policies developed by the Secretary every three years, beginning in 2026, and
recommend updates to the policies as necessary;
(D) review and advise on resources on harassment, hazing, and
bullying prevention and response for school professionals;
(E) annually solicit input from students, parents, and schools on
harassment, hazing, and bullying; and
(F) notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), annually on or before January
15, submit a written report to House and Senate Committees on Education,
which shall hold a joint legislative hearing each legislative session to review
the report. The Advisory Council shall also submit the report to the State
Board of Education at the same time.
(3) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Advisory
Council shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of
expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than 12 meetings
of the Advisory Council per year from funds appropriated to the Agency of
Education.
(e)(f) Definitions. In this subchapter:
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 26 of 27
2026
(1) “Educational institution” and “school” mean a public school or an
approved or recognized independent school as defined in section 11 of this
title.
(2) “Organization,” “pledging,” and “student” have the same meanings
as in section 570i of this title.
(3) “Harassment,” “hazing,” and “bullying” have the same meanings as
in subdivisions 11(a)(26), (30), and (32) of this title.
(4) “School board” means the board of directors or other governing
body of an educational institution when referring to an independent school.
Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $21,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Education in fiscal year 2027 for per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses for the Advisory Council on Harassment, Hazing,
and Bullying Prevention as authorized pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 570(e)(3).
* * * Energy Performance Contracting * * *
Sec. 8. 16 V.S.A. § 3448f(a)(1) is amended to read:
(1) “Cost-saving measure” means any facility improvement, repair,
addition, or alteration or any equipment, fixture, or furnishing to be
constructed or installed in any facility that is designed to reduce energy
consumption and operating costs or to increase the operating efficiency of
facilities for their appointed functions, that is cost effective, and that is further
defined by State Board rule.
VT LEG #390252 v.1

No. 160 Page 27 of 27
2026
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390252 v.1